Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-507
Tax Commissioner; power to inspect; notice to State Fire Marshal.

The Tax Commissioner, in the regular course of conducting inspections of wholesale dealers, agents, and retail dealers, as authorized under section 77-2605, may inspect cigarettes to determine if the cigarettes are marked as required by section 69-505. If the cigarettes are not marked as required, the Tax Commissioner shall notify the State Fire Marshal.

Laws 2009, LB198, § 7.
January 1, 2010